Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-12,109
Rules and regulations.

The Director of Motor Vehicles may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations providing for such forms and procedures as are necessary or desirable to effectuate sections 37-1299 to 37-12,110. Such rules and regulations may include procedures for the removal and disposition of hull identification numbers of abandoned motorboats, forms for local records for abandoned motorboats, and inquiries relating to ownership of such motorboats.

Laws 2004, LB 560, § 22.